Utah statutes.
26-5-2.   Establishment of prevention programs by department.

The department shall establish and operate reasonable programs to prevent, delay, and detect the onset of chronic diseases including cancer, diabetes, cardiovascular and pulmonary diseases, genetic diseases, and such other chronic diseases as the department determines are important in promoting, protecting, and maintaining the public's health.

